Ohio, session 136, SB113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be 5
amended and section 3313.475 of the Revised Code be enacted to 6
read as follows: 7
Sec. 3313.475. (A) Not later than ninety days after the 8
effective date of this section, the board of education of each 9
city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school 10
district shall adopt and enforce a policy that prohibits all of 11
the following: 12
(1) Any orientation or training course regarding 13
diversity, equity, and inclusion; 14
(2) The continuation of existing diversity, equity, and 15
inclusion offices or departments; 16
(3) Establishing new diversity, equity, and inclusion 17

S. B. No. 113 Page 2
As Introduced
offices or departments; 18
(4) Using diversity, equity, and inclusion in job 19
descriptions; 20
(5) Contracting with consultants or third-parties whose 21
role is or would be to promote admissions, hiring, or promotion 22
on the basis of race, ethnicity, religion, sex, sexual 23
orientation, gender identity, or gender expression. 24
(6) Replacing any orientation, training, office, or 25
position designated for the purpose of diversity, equity, and 26
inclusion that is prohibited under the policy with an 27
orientation, training, office, or position under a different 28
designation that serves the same or similar purposes, or that 29
uses the same or similar means. 30
(B) Each board of education shall establish a process 31
under which a student, parent, or district employee may submit a 32
complaint about an alleged violation of the policy. The process 33
shall comply with standards adopted by the director of education 34
and workforce. 35
Under the process, the board of education shall 36
investigate the alleged violation and conduct a fair and 37
impartial hearing regarding the alleged violation. If the 38
hearing determines the policy was violated, the board of 39
education shall determine a resolution to address the violation 40
and prevent any further violation of the policy. 41
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 42
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 43
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 44
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 45
contract filed with the director under this section. 46

S. B. No. 113 Page 3
As Introduced
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 47
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 48
following: 49
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 50
following: 51
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 52
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 53
2003; 54
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 55
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 56
(2) The education program of the school, including the 57
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 58
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 59
focus of the curriculum; 60
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 61
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 62
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 63
assessments; 64
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 65
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 66
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 67
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 68
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 69
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 70
Code; 71
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 72
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 73
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 74

S. B. No. 113 Page 4
As Introduced
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 75
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 76
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 77
student. 78
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 79
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 80
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 81
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 82
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 83
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 84
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 85
117.10 of the Revised Code. 86
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 87
to be used that contains at least the following information: 88
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 89
instructional purposes; 90
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 91
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 92
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 93
that are paid by the school; 94
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 95
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 96
operator, if any. 97
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 98
following: 99
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 100
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 101
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 102

S. B. No. 113 Page 5
As Introduced
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 103
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 104
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 105
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 106
any position. 107
(11) That the school will comply with the following 108
requirements: 109
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 110
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 111
twenty hours per school year. 112
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 113
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 114
the school. 115
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 116
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 117
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 118
religious institution. 119
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 120
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 121
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 122
3313.472, 3313.475, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 123
3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 124
3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 125
3313.6029, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 126
3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 127
3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 128
3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 129
3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 130
3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 131

S. B. No. 113 Page 6
As Introduced
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 132
3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 133
3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 134
3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 135
3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 136
5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 137
3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if 138
it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 139
of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 140
of the Revised Code. 141
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 142
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 143
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 144
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 145
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 146
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 147
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 148
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 149
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 150
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 151
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 152
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 153
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 154
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 155
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 156
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 157
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 158
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 159
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 160
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 161
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 162

S. B. No. 113 Page 7
As Introduced
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 163
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 164
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 165
subject area competency adopted by the department under 166
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 167
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 168
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 169
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 170
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 171
cooperative education developed by the department under division 172
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 173
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 174
months after the end of each school year a report of its 175
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 176
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 177
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 178
in the school. 179
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 180
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 181
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 182
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 183
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 184
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 185
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 186
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 187
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 188
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 189
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 190
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 191
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 192

S. B. No. 113 Page 8
As Introduced
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 193
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 194
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 195
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 196
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 197
unless it is either of the following: 198
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 199
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 200
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 201
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 202
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 203
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 204
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 205
Revised Code. 206
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 207
to employees; 208
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 209
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 210
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 211
(E) of this section. 212
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 213
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 214
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 215
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 216
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 217
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 218
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 219
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 220

S. B. No. 113 Page 9
As Introduced
Revised Code; 221
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 222
or part of an existing public school or educational service 223
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 224
a converted public school or service center building, 225
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 226
that the board of education or service center governing board 227
that operated the school or building before conversion is 228
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 229
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 230
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 231
agreement applicable to such employees; 232
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 233
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 234
governing authority of the community school; 235
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 236
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 237
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 238
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 239
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 240
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 241
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 242
the district in which the school is located; 243
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 244
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 245
located; 246
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 247
other district in the state. 248
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 249

S. B. No. 113 Page 10
As Introduced
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 250
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 251
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 252
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 253
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 254
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 255
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 256
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 257
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 258
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 259
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 260
(b) The authority of the department as the community 261
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 262
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 263
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 264
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 265
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 266
action. 267
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 268
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 269
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 270
with criteria for student participation established by the 271
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 272
Revised Code; 273
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 274
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 275
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 276
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 277
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 278

S. B. No. 113 Page 11
As Introduced
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 279
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 280
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 281
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 282
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 283
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 284
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 285
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 286
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 287
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 288
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 289
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 290
policies will be available for public inspection; 291
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 292
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 293
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 294
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 295
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 296
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 297
the Revised Code; 298
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 299
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 300
of the following information: 301
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 302
will be used; 303
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 304
be determined and documented; 305
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 306
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 307

S. B. No. 113 Page 12
As Introduced
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 308
the school will document participation in learning 309
opportunities; 310
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 311
monitored; 312
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 313
be protected; 314
(g) A description of the professional development 315
activities that will be offered to teachers. 316
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 317
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 318
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 319
interest at a fair market rate; 320
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 321
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 322
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 323
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 324
contracted. 325
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 326
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 327
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 328
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 329
the parent's or student's primary residence. 330
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 331
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 332
students enrolling in or attending the school. 333
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 334
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 335

S. B. No. 113 Page 13
As Introduced
following: 336
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 337
school will be selected in the future; 338
(2) The management and administration of the school; 339
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 340
school or educational service center building, alternative 341
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 342
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 343
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 344
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 345
of the school; 346
(5) Internal financial controls. 347
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 348
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 349
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 350
authority of the school. 351
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 352
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 353
community school may provide for the community school governing 354
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 355
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 356
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 357
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 358
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 359
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 360
receives from the state. 361
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 362
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 363

S. B. No. 113 Page 14
As Introduced
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 364
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 365
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 366
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 367
contract; 368
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 369
performance and the organization and operation of the community 370
school on at least an annual basis; 371
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 372
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 373
contract; 374
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 375
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 376
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 377
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 378
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 379
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 380
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 381
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 382
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 383
closes prior to the end of a school year. 384
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 385
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 386
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 387
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 388
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 389
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 390
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 391
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 392

S. B. No. 113 Page 15
As Introduced
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 393
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 394
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 395
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 396
within one year after the contract entered into under this 397
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 398
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 399
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 400
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 401
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 402
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 403
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 404
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 405
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 406
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 407
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 408
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 409
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 410
3313.475, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 411
3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 412
3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 413
3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 414
3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 415
3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 416
3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 417
3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 418
3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 419
3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 420
3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 421
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 422
3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 423

S. B. No. 113 Page 16
As Introduced
3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 424
3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 425
3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 426
3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 427
5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 428
3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code 429
as if it were a school district. 430
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 431
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 432
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 433
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.475, 3313.5318, 434
3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 435
3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 436
3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 437
3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 438
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 439
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 440
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 441
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 442
were a district board of education. 443
Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 444
3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 445
Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle 446
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 447
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 448
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 449
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 450
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 451
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 452
as presented in this act: 453

S. B. No. 113 Page 17
As Introduced
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 454
214, H.B. 250, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 455
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47, 456
H.B. 214, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 457
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47 458
and H.B. 214 of the 135th General Assembly. 459